Washington statutes.
RCW 19.194.030

Prohibited acts—Gross misdemeanor.

It is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW for:

(1) Any person to remove, alter, or obliterate any manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon the computer hardware that is received as a trade-in or in exchange on the purchase of other computer hardware of greater value. In addition a retailer shall not accept any computer hardware as a trade-in or in exchange on the purchase of other computer hardware of greater value where the manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon the computer hardware has been removed, altered, or obliterated;

(2) Any person to knowingly make, cause, or allow to be made any false entry or misstatement of any material matter in any book, record, or writing required to be kept under this chapter; or

(3) Any person to knowingly violate any other provision of this chapter.

[ 1998 c 134 s 3.]